Hawaii statutes.
[§468M-2] Registration required.
(a) Activity desks shall register with the director prior to engaging in the
business of selling, contracting for, arranging, or advertising that it can or
will arrange, activities which are furnished by an activity provider.
Notwithstanding section 468M-7, any activity desk that violates the provisions
of this section or rules promulgated pursuant thereto shall be fined a sum of
$100 for each day the activity desk is in violation. The sum shall be
collected in a civil suit brought by the department.

(b) Registration shall expire on December 31
of each odd-numbered year. Before December 31 of each odd-numbered year, the
director or the director's authorized delegate shall mail a renewal application
for registration to the address on record of the registrant.

(c) The director by rule, shall establish fees
and requirements for registration, maintenance of registration, renewal,
restoration of registration, of activity desks. [L 1992, c 231, pt of §2, §§3,
6; am L 1995, c 174, §§1, 2; am L 1998, c 248, §§1, 2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next